North Carolina, session 2025, HB1199.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. TITLE
SECTION 1.1. This act shall be known as "The Stronger Enforcement and
Accountability for Transportation Behavior and Emerging Live-saving Technology
(SEATBELT) Act."

PART II. INTELLIGENT SPEED ASSISTANCE SYSTEMS
SECTION 2.1. Article 2 of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
the following new sections to read:
"§ 20-17.10. Restriction of a license after certain speeding convictions; Intelligent Speed
Assistance system.
(a) Definition. – For purposes of this section, the term Intelligent Speed Assistance (ISA)
system means an aftermarket system that uses location-based technology to automatically
regulate vehicle acceleration or speed in accordance with the applicable speed limit.
(b) Scope. – This section applies to applies to a person whose drivers license was revoked,
or whose driving privilege was limited, pursuant to either (i) G.S. 20-16.1 or (ii) a violation of
any of the following:
(1) G.S. 20-140.
(2) G.S. 20-141.
(3) G.S. 20-141.1.
(4) G.S 20-141.3.
(5) G.S. 20-141.4.
(6) G.S. 20-141.5.
(7) G.S. 20-141.6.
(8) G.S. 20-141.10.
(c) ISA System Required. – When the Division restores the license of, or grants a limited
driving privilege to, a person who is subject to this section, in addition to any other restriction or
condition, it shall require the person to agree to and shall indicate on the person's drivers license
*H1199-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
that the person may only operate a vehicle equipped with a functioning ISA system approved by
the Commissioner.
(d) Length of Requirement. – The requirements of subsection (c) shall remain in effect
for one year from the date of restoration..
(e) Vehicles Subject to Requirement. – A person subject to this section shall designate in
accordance with the policies of the Division any registered vehicles owned by that person that
the person operates or intends to operate and have the designated vehicles equipped with a
functioning ISA system of a type approved by the Commissioner. The Commissioner shall not
issue a license to a person subject to this section until presented with proof of the installation of
an ISA system in at least one of the person's designated vehicles. The Commissioner shall cancel
the drivers license of any person subject to this section for operating a vehicle that has not been
designated and equipped with a functioning ISA system in accordance with this subsection, or
removal of the ignition interlock system from any designated motor vehicle owned by the person,
other than when changing ISA system providers or upon sale of the designated vehicle.
(f) Notice of Requirement. – When a court reports to the Division a conviction of a
person who is subject to this section, the Division must send the person written notice of the
requirements of this section and of the consequences of failing to comply with these
requirements. The notification must include a statement that the person may contact the Division
for information on obtaining and having installed an ISA system of a type approved by the
Commissioner.
(g) Effect of Violation of Restriction. – A person subject to this section who violates any
of the restrictions of this section commits the offense of driving while license revoked under
G.S. 20-28 and is subject to punishment as provided in that section.
(h) Notification of Revocation. – If the person's license has not already been surrendered
to the court, the Division must expeditiously notify the person that the person's license to drive
is revoked pursuant to subsection (g) of this section effective on the thirtieth calendar day after
the mailing of the revocation order.
(i) Restoration After Violation. – When the Division restores the license of a person
whose license was revoked pursuant to subsection (g) of this section and the revocation occurred
prior to completion of time period required by subsection (d) of this section, in addition to any
other restriction or condition, it shall require the person to comply with the conditions of
subsection (c) of this section until the person has complied with those conditions for the
cumulative period of time as set forth in subsection (d) of this section. The period of time for
which the person successfully complied with subsection (c) of this section prior to revocation
pursuant to subsection (g) of this section shall be applied towards the requirements of subsection
(d) of this section.
(j) Data collection. – All data collected by ISA systems pursuant to this section shall be
subject to the following restrictions:
(1) An ISA system shall only collect the data necessary to support key functions
such as confirming compliance, evaluating program performance, and
improving system accuracy and effectiveness.
(2) Data collected through an ISA system shall not be disclosed unless: (i) the
disclosure is required by law or regulation or (ii) the disclosed data is
depersonalized and aggregated for research or evaluation purposes.
(3) Data collected through an ISA system shall not be sold, licensed, or used for
commercial purposes.
(k) Tampering. – Any person who tampers with, circumvents, or attempts to circumvent
an ISA system required to be installed on a motor vehicle pursuant to judicial order, statute, or
as may be otherwise required as a condition for an individual to operate a motor vehicle, for the
purpose of avoiding or altering the ISA system's speed or acceleration controls in the operation
Page 2 House Bill 1199-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
or attempted operation of a vehicle is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Each act of tampering,
circumvention, or attempted circumvention under this statute shall constitute a separate violation.
(l) Report to General Assembly. – Beginning on January 1, 2028, and annually
thereafter, the Division shall submit to shall submit to the Chairs of the House and Senate
Transportation Committees of the General Assembly, and post on the Division's website, a report
that summarizes the effectiveness of ISA system usage. The report shall include the number of
program participants, recidivism rates, and user compliance."
SECTION 2.2. G.S. 20-179.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-179.5. Affordability of ignition interlock system.and Intelligent Speed Assistance
systems.
(a) Payment of Costs. – The costs incurred in order to comply with the ignition interlock
or Intelligent Speed Assistance (ISA) requirements imposed by the court or the Division pursuant
to this Chapter, including costs for installation and monitoring of the ignition interlock or ISA
system, shall be paid by the person ordered to install the system. The costs incurred from
voluntarily installing an ignition interlock or ISA system, including costs for monitoring the
ignition interlock or ISA system, shall be paid by the person voluntarily installing the system.
Costs for installation and monitoring of the ignition interlock or ISA system shall be collected
under terms agreed upon by the ignition interlock or ISA system vendor and the person required
to install, or voluntarily installing, the ignition interlock or ISA system.
(b) Waiver. – A person who is ordered by a court, or required by statute, to install an
ignition interlock or ISA system in order to lawfully operate a motor vehicle, but who is unable
to afford the cost of an ignition interlock or ISA system, may apply to an authorized vendor for
a waiver of a portion of the costs of an ignition interlock or ISA system. Additionally, a person
meeting the requirements set forth in sub-subdivisions a. through f. of subdivision (6b) of
subsection (e) of G.S. 20-179 who is unable to afford the cost of an ignition interlock system may
apply to an authorized vendor for a waiver of a portion of the costs of an ignition interlock system.
(c) Affidavit. – A person who applies for a waiver of a portion of the costs of an ignition
interlock or ISA system under subsection (b) of this section shall provide to the vendor on a form
affidavit created by the Division a statement (i) that the person's income is at or below one
hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal poverty line or (ii) that the person is enrolled in any
of the following public assistance programs:
(1) Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF).
(2) Supplemental Security Income (SSI).
(3) Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP).
(4) Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP).
(5) Medicaid.
(d) Supporting Documentation. – A person who submits an affidavit under subsection (c)
of this section shall provide to the vendor documentation confirming the statement set out in the
affidavit. A person may establish the person's income for purposes of this subsection by providing
any of the following:
(1) A copy of the person's federal tax return for the previous year.
(2) A copy of the person's IRS Form W-2 for the previous year.
(3) A copy of the person's pay stubs or monthly income statements for the three
months immediately preceding the date of application under subsection (b) of
this section.
(4) A verification of unemployment benefits paid to the person for the three
months immediately preceding the date of application under subsection (b) of
this section.
(e) Reduction of Costs. – A vendor who receives a waiver under subsection (b) of this
section that complies with the requirements of subsections (c) and (d) of this section shall install
the ignition interlock or ISA system in accordance with both of the following terms:
House Bill 1199-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) The applicant shall not be required to pay for installation or removal of the
ignition interlock or ISA system or systems.
(2) The applicant shall receive a fifty percent (50%) discount on the monthly
service rate charged to persons who are not granted a waiver under this
section.
(f) Review of Denial. – An applicant denied a waiver of ignition interlock or ISA system
costs under this section may seek review by the Division of the vendor's determination. The
Division shall adopt rules to govern its review under this subsection."
SECTION 2.3. No later than December 1, 2026, the Department of Transportation,
Division of Motor Vehicles, shall contract with at least two qualified vendors to implement the
requirements of this Part.
SECTION 2.4. The Division of Motor Vehicles of the Department of Transportation
shall adopt rules to implement this Part.
SECTION 2.5. Sections 2.1 and 2.2 of this act become effective December 1, 2027,
and applies to offenses committed on or after that date.

PART III. MODIFY IGNITION INTERLOCK REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 3.1. G.S. 20-16.2(c1) reads as rewritten:
"(c1) Procedure for Reporting Results and Refusal to Division. – Whenever a person
refuses to submit to a chemical analysis, a person has an alcohol concentration of 0.15 0.08 or
more, or a person's drivers license has an alcohol concentration restriction and the results of the
chemical analysis establish a violation of the restriction, the law enforcement officer and the
chemical analyst shall without unnecessary delay go before an official authorized to administer
oaths and execute an affidavit(s) stating that:all of the following:
(1) The person was charged with an implied-consent offense or had an alcohol
concentration restriction on the drivers license;license.
(2) A law enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe that the person
had committed an implied-consent offense or violated the alcohol
concentration restriction on the drivers license;license.
(3) Whether the implied-consent offense charged involved death or critical injury
to another person, if the person willfully refused to submit to chemical
analysis;analysis.
(4) The person was notified of the rights in subsection (a); and(a).
(5) The results of any tests given or that the person willfully refused to submit to
a chemical analysis.
If the person's drivers license has an alcohol concentration restriction, pursuant to G.S. 20-19(c3),
and an officer has reasonable grounds to believe the person has violated a provision of that
restriction other than violation of the alcohol concentration level, the officer and chemical analyst
shall complete the applicable sections of the affidavit and indicate the restriction which was
violated. The officer shall immediately mail the affidavit(s) to the Division. If the officer is also
the chemical analyst who has notified the person of the rights under subsection (a),(a) of this
section, the officer may perform alone the duties of this subsection."
SECTION 3.2. G.S. 20-16.2(e1) reads as rewritten:
"(e1) Limited Driving Privilege after Six Months in Certain Instances. – A person whose
driver's license has been revoked under this section may apply for and a judge authorized to do
so by this subsection may issue a limited driving privilege if:if all of the following requirements
are met:
(1) At the time of the refusal the person held either a valid drivers license or a
license that had been expired for less than one year;year.
(2) At the time of the refusal, the person had not within the preceding seven years
been convicted of an offense involving impaired driving;driving.
Page 4 House Bill 1199-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) At the time of the refusal, the person had not in the preceding seven years
willfully refused to submit to a chemical analysis under this section;section.
(4) The implied consent offense charged did not involve death or critical injury
to another person;person.
(5) The underlying charge for which the defendant was requested to submit to a
chemical analysis has been finally disposed of:
a. Other than by conviction; or
b. By a conviction of impaired driving under G.S. 20-138.1, at a
punishment level authorizing issuance of a limited driving privilege
under G.S. 20-179.3(b), and the defendant has complied with at least
one of the mandatory conditions of probation listed for the punishment
level under which the defendant was sentenced;sentenced.
(6) Subsequent to the refusal the person has had no unresolved pending charges
for or additional convictions of an offense involving impaired driving;driving.
(7) The person's license has been revoked for at least six months for the refusal;
andrefusal.
(8) The person has obtained a substance abuse assessment from a mental health
facility and successfully completed any recommended training or treatment
program.
(9) All vehicles that the person will be authorized to drive have been equipped
with a type of ignition interlock system approved by the Commissioner.
Except as modified in this subsection, the provisions of G.S. 20-179.3 relating to the procedure
for application and conduct of the hearing and the restrictions required or authorized to be
included in the limited driving privilege apply to applications under this subsection. If the case
was finally disposed of in the district court, the hearing shall be conducted in the district court
district as defined in G.S. 7A-133 in which the refusal occurred by a district court judge. If the
case was finally disposed of in the superior court, the hearing shall be conducted in the superior
court district or set of districts as defined in G.S. 7A-41.1 in which the refusal occurred by a
superior court judge. A limited driving privilege issued under this section authorizes a person to
drive if the person's license is revoked solely under this section or solely under this section and
G.S. 20-17(2). If the person's license is revoked for any other reason, the limited driving privilege
is invalid."
SECTION 3.3. G.S. 20-16.5(p) reads as rewritten:
"(p) Limited Driving Privilege. – A person whose drivers license has been revoked for a
specified period of 30 or 45 days under this section may apply for a limited driving privilege if:if
all of the following requirements are met:
(1) At the time of the alleged offense the person held either a valid drivers license
or a license that had been expired for less than one year;year.
(2) Does not have an unresolved pending charge involving impaired driving
except the charge for which the license is currently revoked under this section
or additional convictions of an offense involving impaired driving since being
charged for the violation for which the license is currently revoked under this
section;section.
(3) The person's license has been revoked for at least 10 days if the revocation is
for 30 days or 30 days if the revocation is for 45 days; anddays.
(4) The person has obtained a substance abuse assessment from a mental health
facility and registers for and agrees to participate in any recommended training
or treatment program.
(5) All vehicles that the person will be authorized to drive have been equipped
with a type of ignition interlock system approved by the Commissioner.
House Bill 1199-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
A person whose license has been indefinitely revoked under this section may, after
completion of 30 days under subsection (e) or the applicable period of time under subdivision
(1), (2), or (3) of subsection (f), apply for a limited driving privilege. In the case of an indefinite
revocation, a judge of the division in which the current offense is pending may issue the limited
driving privilege only if the privilege is necessary to overcome undue hardship and the person
meets the eligibility requirements of G.S. 20-179.3, except that the requirements in
G.S. 20-179.3(b)(1)c. and G.S. 20-179.3(e) shall not apply. Except as modified in this
subsection, the provisions of G.S. 20-179.3 relating to the procedure for application and conduct
of the hearing and the restrictions required or authorized to be included in the limited driving
privilege apply to applications under this subsection. Any district court judge authorized to hold
court in the judicial district is authorized to issue such a limited driving privilege. A limited
driving privilege issued under this section authorizes a person to drive if the person's license is
revoked solely under this section. If the person's license is revoked for any other reason, the
limited driving privilege is invalid."
SECTION 3.4. G.S. 20-17.8 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-17.8. Restoration of a license after certain driving while impaired convictions;
ignition interlock.
(a) Scope. – This section applies to a person whose license was revoked as a result of a
conviction of driving while impaired, G.S. 20-138.1, and any of the following conditions is met:
(1) The person had an alcohol concentration of 0.150.08 or more.more or refused
to submit to a chemical analysis.
(2) The person has been convicted of another offense involving impaired driving,
which offense occurred within seven years immediately preceding the date of
the offense for which the person's license has been revoked.
(3) The person was sentenced pursuant to G.S. 20-179(f3).
For purposes of subdivision (1) of this subsection, the results of a chemical analysis, as shown
by an affidavit or affidavits executed pursuant to G.S. 20-16.2(c1), shall be used by the Division
to determine that person's alcohol concentration.
(a1) Additional Scope. – This section applies to a person whose license was revoked as a
result of a conviction of habitual impaired driving, G.S. 20-138.5. Except for a conviction under
G.S. 20-141.4(a2), this section also applies to a person whose license was revoked as a result of
a conviction under G.S. 20-141.4.
(a2) Under Age 21. – The provisions of this section apply to a person whose license was
revoked as the result of a conviction of driving by a person less than 21 years old after consuming
alcohol pursuant to G.S. 20-138.3.
(b) Ignition Interlock Required. – Except as provided in subsection (l) of this section,
when the Division restores the license of a person who is subject to this section, in addition to
any other restriction or condition, it shall require the person to agree to and shall indicate on the
person's drivers license all of the following restrictions for the period designated in subsection
(c):(c) of this section:
(1) A restriction that the person may operate only a vehicle that is equipped with
a functioning ignition interlock system of a type approved by the
Commissioner. The Commissioner shall not unreasonably withhold approval
of an ignition interlock system and shall consult with the Division of Purchase
and Contract in the Department of Administration to ensure that potential
vendors are not discriminated against. All approved vendors shall report all
attempts to start the vehicle with an alcohol concentration greater than 0.02 or
any other violations of the interlock policies established by the Division for
use of an ignition interlock system or a violation of G.S. 20-17.8A to the
Commissioner in accordance with Division requirements.
Page 6 House Bill 1199-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) A requirement that the person personally activate the ignition interlock system
before driving the motor vehicle.
(3) A requirement that the person not drive with an alcohol concentration of 0.02
or greater.
…."
SECTION 3.5. G.S. 20-138.3(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Limited Driving Privilege. – A person who is convicted of violating subsection (a) of
this section and whose drivers license is revoked solely based on that conviction may apply for
a limited driving privilege as provided in G.S. 20-179.3. This subsection shall apply only if the
person meets both each of the following requirements:
(1) Is 18, 19, or 20 years old on the date of the offense.
(2) Has not previously been convicted of a violation of this section.
(3) Has equipped all vehicles to be operated under a limited driving privilege with
approved ignition interlock systems.
The judge may issue the limited driving privilege only if the person meets the eligibility
requirements of G.S. 20-179.3, other than the requirement in G.S. 20-179.3(b)(1)c.
G.S. 20-179.3(e) shall not apply. All other terms, conditions, and restrictions provided for in
G.S. 20-179.3 shall apply. G.S. 20-179.3, rather than this subsection, governs the issuance of a
limited driving privilege to a person who is convicted of violating subsection (a) of this section
and of driving while impaired as a result of the same transaction."
SECTION 3.6. G.S. 20-179.3(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Eligibility. –
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (3) of this subsection, a person
convicted of the offense of impaired driving under G.S. 20-138.1 is eligible
for a limited driving privilege if all of the following requirements are met:
a. At the time of the offense the person held either a valid driver's license
or a license that had been expired for less than one year.
b. At the time of the offense the person had not within the preceding
seven years been convicted of an offense involving impaired driving.
c. Punishment Level Three, Four, or Five was imposed for the offense of
impaired driving.
d. Subsequent to the offense the person has not been convicted of, or had
an unresolved charge lodged against the person for, an offense
involving impaired driving.
e. The person has obtained and filed with the court a substance abuse
assessment of the type required by G.S. 20-17.6 for the restoration of
a drivers license.
f. The person has installed an approved ignition interlock system on all
vehicles subject to ignition interlock requirements to be operated by
the applicant under a limited driving privilege
…
(3) A person convicted of the offense of impaired driving under G.S. 20-138.1
that has been convicted of not more than one offense involving impaired
driving within the preceding seven years is eligible for a limited driving
privilege if all of the following requirements are met:
a. At the time of the offense the person held either a valid driver's license
or a license that had been expired for less than one year.
b. At the time of the offense the person did not have an alcohol
concentration of 0.15 or more.
c. One of the following punishment levels was imposed for the offense
of impaired driving:
House Bill 1199-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
1. Punishment Level Three, Four, or Five.
2. Punishment Level Two, but only if the Grossly Aggravating
Factor determined to impose Punishment Level Two was the
Grossly Aggravating Factor provided in G.S. 20-179(c)(1).
d. Subsequent to the offense the person has not been convicted of, or had
an unresolved charge lodged against the person for, an offense
involving impaired driving.
e. The person has obtained and filed with the court a substance abuse
assessment of the type required by G.S. 20-17.6 for the restoration of
a drivers license.
f. The person has installed an approved ignition interlock system on all
vehicles subject to ignition interlock requirements to be operated by
the applicant under a limited driving privilege
A person whose North Carolina driver's license is revoked because
of a conviction in another jurisdiction substantially similar to impaired
driving under G.S. 20-138.1 is eligible for a limited driving privilege
if the person would be eligible for it had the conviction occurred in
North Carolina. Eligibility for a limited driving privilege following a
revocation under G.S. 20-16.2(d) is governed by G.S. 20-16.2(e1)."
SECTION 3.7. G.S. 20-179.3(g5) reads as rewritten:
"(g5) Ignition Interlock Required. – If a person's drivers license is revoked for a conviction
of G.S. 20-138.1, and the person had an alcohol concentration of 0.150.08 or more ormore, is
eligible for a limited driving privilege pursuant to subdivision (b)(3) of this section, or refused to
submit to a chemical analysis, a judge shall include all of the following in a limited driving
privilege order:
If the limited driving privilege order includes the restrictions set forth in this subsection, then
the limitations set forth in subsections (a), (f), (g), (g1), and (g2) of this section do not apply
when the person is operating the designated motor vehicle with a functioning ignition interlock
system. For purposes of this subsection, the results of a chemical analysis presented at trial or
sentencing shall be sufficient to prove a person's alcohol concentration, shall be conclusive, and
shall not be subject to modification by any party, with or without approval by the court. The
removal of the ignition interlock system prior to the end of the revocation period or any extension
shall void the limited driving privilege and the Division shall remove the limited driving privilege
from the person's driving record. The interlock provider shall notify the holder of the limited
driving privilege that removal voids the limited driving privilege in accordance with Division
policy. The Division shall notify the person by first class mail at the address on file with the
Division that the limited driving privilege is void and does not authorize driving due to removal
of the ignition interlock system.
(1) A restriction that the applicant may operate only a designated motor vehicle.
(2) A requirement that the designated motor vehicle be equipped with a
functioning ignition interlock system of a type approved by the
Commissioner, which is set to prohibit driving with an alcohol concentration
of greater than 0.02. The Commissioner shall not unreasonably withhold
approval of an ignition interlock system and shall consult with the Division of
Purchase and Contract in the Department of Administration to ensure that
potential vendors are not discriminated against. All approved vendors shall
report all attempts to start the vehicle with an alcohol concentration greater
than 0.02 or any other violations of the interlock policies established by the
Division for use of an ignition interlock system or a violation of
G.S. 20-17.8A to the Commissioner in accordance with Division
requirements.
Page 8 House Bill 1199-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) A requirement that the applicant personally activate the ignition interlock
system before driving the motor vehicle.
SECTION 3.8. This Part becomes effective December 1, 2027, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.

PART IV. SCHOOL ZONE TRAFFIC CAMERAS
SECTION 4.1. G.S. 8-50.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 8-50.4. Results of electronic speed-measuring instruments speed and traffic safety
monitoring systems to enforce speed limits traffic laws in school zones;
admissibility.
(a) The results of the use of an electronic speed-measuring speed and traffic safety
monitoring system as described in G.S. 160A-300.4 and G.S. 153A-246.1 shall be admissible as
evidence in nonjudicial administrative hearings held pursuant to G.S. 160A-300.4(d)(5) or
G.S. 153A-246.1(d)(5).
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the results of an
electronic speed-measuring speed and traffic safety monitoring system are not admissible unless
all of the following are established:
(1) The electronic speed-measuring speed and traffic safety monitoring system
employed was approved for use by the North Carolina Criminal Justice
Education and Training Standards Commission and the Secretary of Public
Safety pursuant to G.S. 17C-6.
(2) The electronic speed-measuring speed and traffic safety monitoring system
was calibrated and tested for accuracy in accordance with the standards
established by the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training
Standards Commission and the Secretary of Public Safety for that particular
system.
(c) All electronic speed-measuring speed and traffic safety monitoring systems shall be
calibrated and tested in accordance with standards established by the North Carolina Criminal
Justice Education and Training Standards Commission and the Secretary of Public Safety. A
written certificate by a technician certified by the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and
Training Standards Commission showing that a test was made within the required testing period
and that the system was accurate shall be competent and prima facie evidence of those facts in a
nonjudicial administrative hearing held pursuant to G.S. 160A-300.4(d)(5) or
G.S. 153A-246.1(d)(5).
(d) In every nonjudicial administrative hearing held pursuant to G.S. 160A-300.4(d)(5)
or G.S. 153A-246.1(d)(5), where the results of an electronic speed-measuring speed and traffic
safety monitoring system are sought to be admitted, notice shall be taken of the rules approving
the electronic speed-measuring speed and traffic safety monitoring system and the procedures
for calibration or testing for accuracy of the system. "
SECTION 4.2. G.S. 17C-6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 17C-6. Powers of Commission.
(a) In addition to powers conferred upon the Commission elsewhere in this Article, the
Commission shall have the following powers, which shall be enforceable through its rules and
regulations, certification procedures, or the provisions of G.S. 17C-10:
…
(13b) In conjunction with the Secretary of Public Safety, approve use of specific
models and types of electronic speed-measuring speed and traffic safety
monitoring systems as described in G.S. 160A-300.4(a) and
G.S. 153A-246.1(a) and establish standards for calibration and testing for
accuracy of each approved system.
…."
House Bill 1199-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4.3. G.S. 153A-246.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 153A-246.1. Use of electronic speed-measuring speed and traffic safety monitoring
systems to enforce speed limits in school zones.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) An electronic speed-measuring system is a Electronic speed and traffic safety
monitoring system.—A mobile or fixed device consisting of an automated
traffic camera and sensor capable of of: (i) measuring speed a vehicle's speed,
positioning, or both and (ii) producing one or more digital photographs or
videos of a motor vehicle violating any of the following: (i) a posted speed
limit.limit, (ii) G.S. 20-158, or (iii) G.S. 20-173.
(2) School zone. – An area near a public, private or parochial school where,
pursuant to G.S. 20-141.1, the Board of Transportation or local authorities
have set speed limits lower than those designated by G.S. 20-141.
…
(d) A county may adopt ordinances for the civil enforcement of G.S. 20-141.1 of: (i)
G.S. 20-141.1, (ii) a violation of G.S. 20-158 within a school zone, or (iii) a violation of
G.S. 20-173 within a school zone by means of an electronic speed-measuring speed and traffic
safety monitoring system. Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 20-141.1 G.S. 20-141.1,
G.S. 20-158, G.S. 20-173, and G.S. 20-176, in the event that a county adopts an ordinance
pursuant to this section, a violation of G.S. 20-141.1 G.S. 20-141.1, G.S. 20-158, or G.S. 20-173
detected by an electronic speed-measuring speed and traffic safety monitoring system shall not
be an infraction if a citation is issued in accordance with this subsection. An ordinance authorized
by this subsection shall provide that:
…
(3) The citation shall contain all of the following:
a. The recorded image or video of the vehicle speeding.vehicle: (i)
speeding, (ii) violating G.S. 20-158, or (iii) violating G.S. 20-173.
…
d. TheFor violations of G.S. 20-141.1, the recorded speed.
…."
SECTION 4.4. G.S. 160A-300.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160A-300.4. Use of electronic speed-measuring speed and traffic safety monitoring
systems to enforce speed limits in school zones.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) An electronic speed-measuring system is a Electronic speed and traffic safety
monitoring system. – A mobile or fixed device consisting of an automated
traffic camera and sensor capable of of (i) measuring speed a vehicle's speed,
positioning, or both and (ii) producing one or more digital photographs or
videos of a motor vehicle violating any of the following: (i) a posted speed
limit. limit, (ii) G.S. 20-158, or (iii) G.S. 20-173.
…
(d) A municipality may adopt ordinances for the civil enforcement of G.S. 20-141.1 of:
(i) G.S. 20-141.1, (ii) a violation of G.S. 20-158 within a school zone, or (iii) a violation of
G.S. 20-173 within a school zone by means of an electronic speed-measuring speed and traffic
safety monitoring system. Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 20-141.1 G.S. 20-141.1,
G.S. 20-158, G.S. 20-173, and G.S. 20-176, in the event that a municipality adopts an ordinance
pursuant to this section, a violation of G.S. 20-141.1 G.S. 20-141.1, G.S. 20-158, or G.S. 20-173
detected by an electronic speed-measuring speed and traffic safety monitoring system shall not
be an infraction if a citation is issued in accordance with this subsection. An ordinance authorized
by this subsection shall provide that:
…
Page 10 House Bill 1199-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) The citation shall contain all of the following:
a. The recorded image or video of the vehicle speeding. vehicle: (i)
speeding, (ii) violating G.S. 20-158, or (iii) violating G.S. 20-173.
…
d. The For violations of G.S. 20-141.1, the recorded speed.
…."
SECTION 4.5. This Part becomes effective October 1, 2026.

PART V. APPROPRIATION OF FUNDS
SECTION 5.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Administrative
Office of the Courts the sum of nine million dollars ($9,000,000) in nonrecurring funds in the
2026-2026 fiscal year to be used for the recordation of district court proceedings.
SECTION 5.2. This Part becomes effective July 1, 2026.

PART VI. SAVINGS CLAUSE AND EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6.1. Prosecutions for offenses committed before the effective date of this
act are not abated or affected by this act, and the statutes that would be applicable but for this act
remain applicable to those prosecutions.
SECTION 6.2. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
House Bill 1199-First Edition Page 11